Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1708
Corner markers; perpetuation; duty of county board; notice of destruction.

It shall be the duty of the county board of each county to cause to be perpetuated the existing corners of land surveys along the public roads and highways where such corners are liable to destruction, either by public travel or construction or maintenance. The board shall cause to be established witness corners in at least two directions and cause such work to be recorded after the manner of other surveys. It shall be the duty of every person supervising the construction, improvement or maintenance of the public roads or highways, to notify the county surveyor of the destruction of any corners of land surveys. If there is no county surveyor in the county, then such notice shall be given to the county board.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 8, p. 543.

County surveyor, duties, see sections 23-1907 and 23-1908.